Hawaii statutes.
[§37-47] Reporting of non-general
fund information. No later than twenty days prior to the convening of each
regular session, each department shall submit to the legislature a report for
each non-general fund account which shall include but not be limited to, the
following:

(1) The name of the fund and a cite to the law
authorizing the fund;

(2) The intended purpose of the fund;

(3) The current program activities which the fund
supports;

(4) The balance of the fund at the beginning of the
current fiscal year;

(5) The total amount of expenditures and other
outlays from the fund account for the previous fiscal year;

(6) The total amount of revenue deposited to the
account for the previous fiscal year;

(7) A detailed listing of all transfers from the fund;

(8) The amount of moneys encumbered in the account as
of the beginning of the fiscal year;

(9) The amount of funds in the account which are
required for the purposes of bond conveyance or other related bond obligations;

(10) The amount of moneys in the account derived from
bond proceeds; and

(11) The amount of moneys of the fund held in
certificates of deposit, escrow accounts or other investments. [L Sp
1995, c 15, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next